Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 7. Judicial Retirement

§ 9-3-701.
Short title.

This act is known and may be cited as “The Wyoming Judicial Retirement Act”.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 76, § 1.

§ 9-3-702.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Account” means an account established for the purpose of accounting for funds used to provide benefits to employees covered under this act;

“Board” or “retirement board” means the retirement board of the Wyoming retirement system established by the Wyoming Retirement Act, article 4 of this chapter 3 [§

9-3-401

et seq.];

“Credited service” means service as a justice of the supreme court, as a district judge or a circuit court judge for which contributions were made and not refunded under this act;

“Disability” means a determination by the supreme court or a special supreme court of mandatory retirement of the employee for a disability as provided in Wyoming Constitution, Article 5, Section 6(g);

“Employee” means any justice of the supreme court, district judge, chancery court judge or circuit court judge appointed to any of those offices on or after July 1, 1998, and with no prior service as a justice of the supreme court or district judge at the time of the appointment. “Employee” also includes any justice or judge who elects to participate in the judicial retirement program under this act in accordance with W.S.

9-3-713

;

“Employer” means the Wyoming supreme court, for justices, chancery court judges and circuit court judges, or a district court;

“Highest average salary” means the average annual salary of a member for the highest paid three (3) years of continuous service;

“Interest” means interest compounded annually at such rate or rates as shall be determined by the board, not exceeding the average amount of interest actually earned per annum by the account;

“Retirement program” means the Wyoming judicial retirement program created by this act;

“Salary” means the cash remuneration paid, including contributions required by W.S.

9-3-704

, to an employee for his services;

“Member account” means:

For an employee who has a minimum of four (4) years of service or an employee initially employed before July 1, 2018, the employee’s contributions paid from any source;

For an employee who has fewer than four (4) years of service and who is initially employed on or after July 1, 2018, only the employee’s contributions paid by a reduction in cash salary of the employee.

“This act” means W.S.

9-3-701

through

9-3-713

.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 76, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2015 ch. 10, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 200, § 2, effective March 15, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(i), deleted “within the trust and agency fund” preceding “established”; and in (a)(viii), substituted “account” for “fund.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(viii), substituted “Interest” for “Regular Interest” and inserted “or rates.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (a)(xi) and redesignated former (xi) as (xii).

The 2019 amendment,

in (a)(v), substituted "district judge, chancery court judge or circuit court judge" for "district judge appointed or circuit court judge," and in (a)(vi) substituted "for justices, chancery court judges and circuit court judges" for "both for justices and circuit court judges."

Laws 2019, ch. 200, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2019.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2018, ch. 31, § 2, provides: “This act shall apply to the distribution
of benefits subject to this act made on and after the effective date
of this act.

“Nothing in
this act shall be construed to modify or impair existing contracts
or other obligations executed prior to the effective date of this
act.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2008, ch. 21, § 3, provides:

“(a) There is appropriated from the general fund to the judicial retirement account defined by W.S. 9 3 702(a)(i), seven hundred sixty-one thousand nine hundred dollars ($761,900.00) to fund the additional liability of the judicial retirement system under this act.

“(b) There is appropriated from the general fund to the supreme court four hundred ten thousand eight hundred forty-six dollars ($410,846.00). This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2010. This appropriation shall only be expended for the additional contributions required or authorized under this act. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2010.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-3-703.
Administration.

There is created the retirement program which is for the benefit of the employees defined in W.S. 9-3-702(a)(v).

The administration and responsibility for the operation of the retirement program is under the direction and control of the board. All matters pertaining to the board are applicable to the retirement program created by this act. For the purposes of administration of this act, the Wyoming Retirement Act applies to this act to the extent not inconsistent with this act, or where by the terms of the Wyoming Retirement Act, its provisions can have no application. Specifically, with respect to this act, W.S.

9-3-408

applies with respect to investment of funds and service as custodian of funds in the account and the board has rulemaking authority in accordance with W.S.

9-3-409

.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 76, § 1.

§ 9-3-704.
Employee contributions.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, every employee covered by this article shall pay into the account nine and twenty-two one-hundredths percent (9.22%) of his salary. To the extent this contribution is not paid by the employer as authorized in this section, this payment shall be deducted each pay period from employees’ salaries by the respective fiscal officers of the employers.

The entire contribution required by subsection (a) of this section shall be paid by the employer for employees covered under this article in order to be treated as employer contributions for the sole purpose of determining tax treatment under the United States Internal Revenue Code.

The contributions under subsection (b) of this section shall be paid from the source of funds which is used in paying salary to the employee. The employer may pay these contributions without offset of the employee’s salary in the same salary percentage as provided by state employers under W.S. 9-3-412(c). The employer shall also reduce the cash salary of the employee by three and sixty-five hundredths percent (3.65%).

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 76, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2008, ch. 21, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), substituted “account” for “fund.”

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added “To the extent this contribution is not paid by the employer as authorized in this section,” in (a); substituted “entire contribution” for “contributions” near the beginning of (b); and in (c) substituted “may” for “shall,” and substituted “9-3-412(c)” for “9-3-412(a).”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-3-705.
Employer contributions.

Each employer subject to this act shall pay into the account a contribution equal to fourteen and five-tenths percent (14.5%) of the salary paid to each employee covered by this act. These contributions, together with the employees’ contributions shall be transferred and credited to the retirement program in a manner the board directs.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 76, § 1; 2005, ch. 27, § 1; ch. 231, § 1; 2008, ch. 21, § 1.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 27, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “eight and seventy-eight hundredths percent (8.78%) of the salary paid to each employee covered by this act” for “the same percentage specified under W.S.

9-3-413

of all salaries paid to its employees.”

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “account” for “fund.”

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating amendments made by both 2005 acts.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “fourteen and five-tenths percent (14.5%)” for “eight and seventy-eight hundredths percent (8.78%).”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2005, ch. 27, § 2, appropriates $95,000 from the general fund to the supreme court to make the contributions required by the act.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-3-706.
Age of retirement.

An employee is eligible for retirement under this act when he has served as a judge of the supreme court, a district court, a chancery court judge, a circuit court or service in any combination of those positions after July 1, 1998, if:

He is at least sixty (60) years of age and has at least twenty (20) years of credited service;

He is at least sixty-five (65) years of age and has at least four (4) years of credited service;

He has less than four (4) years of credited service but has served continuously from the date of appointment to the age of seventy (70) years;

He has not less than ten (10) years and is retired for disability;

He has not less than four (4) years of service to his credit and is at least fifty-five (55) years of age, but any benefit received by an employee under this paragraph shall be reduced by five percent (5%) for each year of retirement prior to age sixty-five (65).

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 76, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2008, ch. 21, § 1; 2019 ch. 200, § 2, effective March 15, 2019.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “four (4) years” for “fifteen (15) years” in (a)(ii) and (a)(iii); and in (a)(v), substituted “fifty-five (55) years” for “sixty (60) years,” and substituted “shall be reduced by five percent (5%) for each year of retirement prior to age sixty-five (65)” for “shall be on an actuarially reduced basis as determined by the board.”

The 2019 amendment,

in the introductory language in (a), substituted “a district court, a chancery court judge, a circuit court” for “a district court, a circuit court.”

Laws 2019, ch. 200, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2019.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-3-707.
Amount of benefit; adjustments.

Any employee who has left service covered under this act, and who has not withdrawn his accumulated contributions, is eligible to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the terms of this act at the age specified in W.S.

9-3-706

. The service retirement allowance payable to an employee under this act is subject to the following:

The amount shall be equal to the percentage computed under paragraph (ii) of this subsection times the employee’s highest average salary as defined in W.S. 9-3-702(a)(vii);

For the purposes of making the computation under paragraph (i) of this subsection, the percentage shall be computed based upon the sum of the following for credited service:

Four percent (4%) for each of the first five (5) years of credited service;

Three percent (3%) for each year from and including the sixth year through the fifteenth year of credited service;

Two percent (2%) for each year from and including the sixteenth year through the twentieth year of credited service;

One percent (1%) for each year from and after the twenty-first year of credited service.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 21, § 2.

For an employee retired for disability, W.S. 9-3-422(a) and (b) apply with respect to computing the amount of the benefit.

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 107, § 3.

W.S.

9-3-430

applies to this act.

Benefits shall not be payable under the program to the extent that they exceed the limitations imposed by section 415(b) of the Internal Revenue Code. The board shall provide any benefits in excess of the limitations under special pay plans authorized under W.S. 9-3-405(b) to the extent the benefits can be provided and the program retain qualified plan status under the Internal Revenue Code.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 76, § 1; 2004, ch. 55, § 1; 2008, ch. 21, § 2; 2010, ch. 58, § 1; 2012, ch. 107, § 3.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, rewrote (b)(ii) and (iii), modifying benefit adjustments for cost-of-living increases.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, repealed former (a)(iii), which read: “The retirement allowance shall not exceed sixty-five percent (65%) of the highest average salary.”

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (d).

The 2012 amendment,

repealed former (b), which read: “Effective July 1, 2000, and on each July 1 thereafter, any service retirement allowance or survivor benefit received by eligible individuals under this act shall be adjusted as follows: (i) Before each July 1, the board shall determine the percentage increase in the cost of living for the preceding calendar year. The percentage increase in the cost of living for a calendar year is equal to the annual percentage increase in the cost of living as of the immediately preceding January 1, as shown by the Wyoming cost-of-living index as determined by the division of economic analysis of the department of administration and information; (ii) Subject to the limitation imposed under paragraph (vi) of this subsection, the benefits existing on each July 1 for each eligible individual may be increased by an amount not to exceed the greater of the percentage increase in the cost of living as determined by the board under paragraph (i) of this subsection or a percentage adjustment to a level the actuary of the Wyoming retirement system determines to be actuarially sound pursuant to paragraph (v) of this subsection; (iii) The amount of any percentage increase in the cost of living which exceeds the percentage adjustment under paragraph (ii) of this subsection shall to the extent determined actuarially sound by the system's actuary, be accumulated and added to the percentage increases in the cost of living for future years; (iv) Individuals who have been receiving applicable benefits for at least one (1) year are eligible for the benefits under this subsection; (v) An increase in benefits under this subsection is effective only upon a determination by the actuary of the Wyoming retirement system that the increase is actuarially sound. The actuary shall report its annual determination under this paragraph to the governor, the Wyoming supreme court, the board and the joint appropriations interim committee; and (vi) The total benefit adjustment under this subsection shall not exceed three percent (3%) in any one (1) year.”

Laws 2012, ch. 107, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2012.

§ 9-3-708.
Death benefits; survivor's benefits.

W.S.

9-3-421

applies to employees and their survivors under this act.

Upon the death of a former employee who is receiving a retirement allowance under this act, the employee’s survivor shall receive a monthly retirement allowance during the survivor’s life equal to fifty percent (50%) of the allowance received by the former employee under this act at the time of the employee’s death.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 76, § 1; 2012, ch. 107, § 2.

The 2012 amendment,

in (b), deleted the former last sentence, which read: “Survivor's benefits are subject to the adjustment under W.S. 9-3-707(b).”

Laws 2012, ch. 107, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2012.

§ 9-3-709.
Refund of contributions upon termination of employment; procedure; redeposit; limitation on refund.

Any employee covered by this act who terminates his employment is entitled to a refund of his member account plus interest thereon, except that commencing July 1, 2019 for an employee who has fewer than four (4) years of service to his credit, no interest shall accrue to the member account during any period in which the employee is not employed by a participating employer. The refunds shall be made only upon written request to the board. Any employee who withdraws from the system under this section shall forfeit all rights to further benefits, employer matching contributions and service credit under the system. Any person who later returns to service covered by this act may redeposit the amount of the contributions withdrawn, in lump sum, together with interest, if any, and upon earning not less than two (2) years credited service, may reestablish his service credits as of the time of withdrawal of his contributions. Any redeposit payment pursuant to this section shall be made not later than ten (10) years following the date of reemployment or prior to retirement, whichever first occurs.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 76, § 1; 2015 ch. 10, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 52, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “interest” for “regular interest” in the first and third sentences; and substituted “ten (10)” for “seven (7)” in the last sentence.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted “refund of his member account plus interest” for “refund of the amount of the employee's contributions plus interest” in the first sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added “except that commencing July 1, 2019 for an employee who has fewer than four (4) years of service to his credit, no interest shall accrue to the member account during any period in which the employee is not employed by a participating employer” at the end of the first sentence.

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2018, ch. 31, § 2, provides: “This act shall apply to the distribution
of benefits subject to this act made on and after the effective date
of this act.

“Nothing in
this act shall be construed to modify or impair existing contracts
or other obligations executed prior to the effective date of this
act.”

Laws 2019, ch. 52, § 2, provides: "This act shall apply to the distribution of benefits subject to this act made on and after the effective date of this act."

§ 9-3-710.
Disposition of funds; custodian of monies.

Funds accruing to the account used to fund benefits for the program under this act shall be commingled with all money on deposit with the state treasurer in the Wyoming retirement account. The board may designate the state treasurer as the custodian of the retirement account. Disbursements from the account for purposes as specified in W.S. 9-3-407(c) shall be made upon warrants drawn by the state auditor upon certification by authorized system employees or using an appropriate alternative method approved by the state auditor. All disbursements from the account shall be accounted for in accordance with the uniform state accounting system or in a manner approved by the state auditor or the state treasurer as provided under W.S.

9-4-214

. As used in this section, “authorized system employees” means the director and his designees who have authorized signatures on file with the state auditor, “director” means the director of the Wyoming retirement system, and “system” means the Wyoming retirement system.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 76, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2021 ch. 72, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in the first sentence deleted “in the trust and agency fund ” following “Funds accruing to the account,” and substituted “account” for “fund” at the end.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the third sentence, deleted "only" following "shall be made" and added "or using an appropriate alternative method approved by the state auditor."

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-3-711.
Payment of employers' contribution from budgets.

Provision for the payment of the employers’ contribution under this act shall be made in the budget of the Wyoming supreme court and the district courts. Provision for the payment of that portion of the employee’s contribution authorized to be made by the employer under this act shall be requested in the budget of the Wyoming supreme court and the district courts.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 76, § 1; 2008, ch. 21, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added the second sentence.

§ 9-3-712.
Exemption of benefits from state and local taxes, execution and attachment; benefits paid under qualified domestic relations order.

Benefits and allowances set forth under this article are exempt from any state, county or municipal tax and are not subject to execution or attachment by trustee process or otherwise, in law or equity, or under any other process, and are not assignable except as specially provided in this article.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, benefits and allowances under this article may be paid in accordance with qualified domestic relations orders pursuant to W.S.

9-3-426

.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 76, § 1.

§ 9-3-713.
Election to transfer into the system established under this act.

Any Wyoming supreme court justice, district judge or circuit court judge appointed before July 1, 1998, may elect to be covered under the retirement system established under this act subject to the following terms and conditions:

The election shall be made by providing notice to the board not later than December 31, 1999, or prior to retirement, whichever is earlier, and making any payment required under paragraph (iii) of this subsection. An election made pursuant to this section may be rescinded at any time before the electing judge or justice collects retirement from the retirement system established under this act;

For county judges, the board shall transfer the funds in the judge’s member account in the retirement system as defined in W.S. 9-3-402(a)(i) and the matching employer contributions along with interest on both to the account created in W.S. 9-3-702(a)(i) to fund retirement under this act;

A circuit court judge making an election under this section shall also pay to the board an amount determined by the board which shall be deposited into the retirement system account used to fund the retirement benefits under this act. The amount shall be equal to three and sixty-five hundredths percent (3.65%) of his salary for each year of service to be credited under this act plus interest, or an amount sufficient to cover the unfunded liability for retirement benefits under this section after the transfer under paragraph (ii) of this section, whichever is less. Notwithstanding paragraph (i) of this subsection, a circuit court judge appointed before July 1, 1998, may elect to be covered under this act by providing notice to the board not later than December 31, 2003, or prior to retirement, whichever is earlier, and making any payment required under this paragraph.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 76, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2003, ch. 187, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2015 ch. 10, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(ii) substituted “created in W.S. 9-3-702(a)(i)” for “in the trust and agency fund.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “interest” for “regular interest” in the (a)(ii) and (a)(iii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”